zh-CN: 耳塞形状: 铃声; 子弹; 圆锥型; 轮廓; 圆柱形; 翼状; 圆形; 锥形; 其他
pt-BR: Formato do protetor auricular: Sino; Marcador; Cone; Contornado; Cilíndrico; Com flanges; Redondo; Cônico; Outro
nb: Øreproppform: Bjelle; Kule; Kjegle; Konturformet; Sylindrisk; Med flens; Rund; Avsmalnet; Annet
vi: Hình dạng nút tai: Chuông; Đạn; Hình nón; Hình dạng được định hình; Hình trụ; Có cánh; Tròn; Vót nhọn; Khác
en: Earplug shape: Bell; Bullet; Cone; Contoured; Cylindrical; Flanged; Round; Tapered; Other
fi: Korvatulpan muoto: Kello; Luoti; Kartio; Muotoiltu; Lieriömäinen; Laipallinen; Pyöreä; Kapeneva; Muu
el: Σχήμα ωτασπίδων: Κωδωνοειδές; Με σχήμα μυτερού κώνου; Κώνος; Με περίγραμμα; Κυλινδρικό; Με πτερύγια; Στρογγυλό; Κωνική; Άλλο
pl: Kształt zatyczek do uszu: Dzwon; jednorazowo; Stożek; Wyprofilowane; Cylindryczne; Z kołnierzem; Okrągły; Zwężany; Inne
it: Forma del tappo per le orecchie: Campana; Proiettile; Cono; Sagomata; Cilindrico; Flangiato; Rotondo; Affusolato; Altro
pt-PT: Formato do tampão para ouvido: Sino; Ponto; Cone; Contornado; Cilíndrico; Com flanges; Redondo; Afunilado; Outro
de: Ohrstöpselform: Glocke; Kugel; Kegel; Konturiert; Zylindrisch; Mit Lamellen; Kreis; Abgeschrägt; Sonstiges
ko: 귀마개 모양: 벨; 불릿; 원뿔; 윤곽; 원통형; 플랜지형; 라운드; 테이퍼드; 기타
hu: Füldugó alakja: Harang; Golyó; Tölcsér; Kontúros; Henger; Peremes; Kerek; Kúpos; Egyéb
cs: Tvar špuntů do uší: Zvonek; Kulová; Kužel; Konturovaný; Válcový; S přírubami; Kulaté; Kuželové; Jiné
sk-SK: Tvar chráničov uší: Zvon; Malá valcovitá; Kužeľový; Tvarovaný; Valcový; S prírubami; Okrúhly; Zúžený; Iné
nl: Oordopvorm: Klok; Bullet; Kegel; Voorgevormd; Cilindrisch; Met flensen; Rond; Taps toelopend; Andere
sl-SI: Oblika čepka za ušesa: Talni; Cilindrična; Stožec; Oblikovana; Cilindričen; S prirobnicami; Okrogel; Zožena; Drugo
bg-BG: Форма на тапите за уши: Звънец; Куршум; Конус; Контурен; Цилиндрична; С перки; Кръгъл; Конусовиден; Други
lt-LT: Ausų kamštelių forma: Varpelis; Kulkos formos; Gaubtas; Kontūruotas; Cilindras; Briaunuotas; Apvali; Smailėjantis; Kita
ro-RO: Forma dopurilor auricular: Clopot; De tip glonț; Con; Conturat; Cilindric; Cu flanșe; Rotundă; Conic; Altele
es: Forma del tapón para los oídos: Campana; Viñeta; Cono; Contorneado; Cilíndrico; Con bridas; Redondo; Cónico; Otros
hr-HR: Oblik čepića za uši: Zvono; U obliku metka; Čunj; Konturirana; Cilindrična; S prirubnicom; Okrugla; Suženog vrha; Ostalo
zh-TW: 耳塞形狀: 鐘聲; 子彈; 錐體; 輪廓; 圓柱形; 法蘭形; 圓頭; 錐型; 其他
ja: 耳栓形状: ベル; 弾丸; 円錐形; 輪郭; 円筒形; フランジ型; ラウンド; テーパード; その他
ru: Форма берушей: Колокол; Конус; Конус; Контурный; Цилиндрическая; С фланцами; Круглый; Усеченный; Другой
th: รูปทรงที่อุดหู: กระดิ่ง; กระสุน; กรวย; โค้งมน; ทรงกระบอก; มีขอบ; ทรงกลม; ตัดเฉียง; อื่นๆ
sv: Öronproppsform: Klocka; Kula; Kon; Konturerad; Cylindriskt; Flänsat; Rund; Konisk; Övrigt
da: Ørepropform: Klokke; Kugle; Kegle; Kontureret; Cylindrisk; Med flanger; Rund; Tilspidset; Andet
tr: Kulak tıkacı şekli: Zil; Kurşun; Koni; Konturlu; Silindirik; Kanatlı; Yuvarlak; Konik; Diğer
fr: Forme de bouchon d’oreille: Cloche; Balle; Cône; Profilé; Cylindrique; À ailettes; Rond; Conique; Autre